apertium-nap.nap.dix
	    <pardef n="prim/o__adj">
		<e><p><l>o</l><r>o<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
		<e><p><l>a</l><r>o<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>	
		<e><p><l>i</l><r>o<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>	
		<e><p><l>e</l><r>o<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>	
		<e><p><l>mo</l><r>o<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e> <!--geminated version-->
		<e><p><l>ma</l><r>o<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e> <!--geminated version-->	
		<e><p><l>mi</l><r>o<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e> <!--geminated version-->	
		<e><p><l>me</l><r>o<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e> <!--geminated version-->				
	    </pardef>

	    <pardef n="C__num">
		<e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="num"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
	    </pardef>
	    <pardef n="san/__np">
		<e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="np"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
		<e>      <p><l>t</l>          <r><s n="np"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
		<e>     <p><l>to</l>          <r><s n="np"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
		<e>     <p><l>ta</l>          <r><s n="np"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
		<e>     <p><l>te</l>          <r><s n="np"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
	    </pardef>
	    <pardef n="che__prn">
		<e><p><l></l><r><s n="prn"/><s n="itg"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
	    </pardef>
	    <pardef n="ann/o__n">
		<e>       <p><l>i</l>          <r>o<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
		<e>       <p><l>o</l>          <r>o<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
	    </pardef>
	    
	    <pardef n="io__prn">
                <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
            </pardef>
            
            <pardef n="tu__prn">
                <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
            </pardef>

  </pardefs>

    <e lm="san">	    <i>san</i><par n="san/__np"/></e>
    <e lm="che">            <i>che</i><par n="che__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="comme">          <i>comme</i><par n="che__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="anno">	    <i>ann</i><par n="ann/o__n"/></e>
    <e lm="ll'anno">	    <i>ll'ann</i><par n="ann/o__n"/></e>
    <e lm="primo">	    <i>prim</i><par n="prim/o__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="AC">              <i>AC</i><par n="C__num"/></e>
    <e lm="C">               <i>C</i><par n="C__num"/></e>
    <e lm="D">               <i>D</i><par n="C__num"/></e>
    <e lm="I">               <i>I</i><par n="C__num"/></e>
    <e lm="II">              <i>II</i><par n="C__num"/></e>
    <e lm="III">             <i>III</i><par n="C__num"/></e>
    <e lm="IV">              <i>IV</i><par n="C__num"/></e>
    <e lm="IX">              <i>IX</i><par n="C__num"/></e>
    <e lm="L">               <i>L</i><par n="C__num"/></e>
    <e lm="M">               <i>M</i><par n="C__num"/></e>
    <e lm="V">               <i>V</i><par n="C__num"/></e>
    <e lm="VI">              <i>VI</i><par n="C__num"/></e>
    <e lm="VII">             <i>VII</i><par n="C__num"/></e>
    <e lm="VIII">            <i>VIII</i><par n="C__num"/></e>
    <e lm="X">               <i>X</i><par n="C__num"/></e>
    <e lm="XI">              <i>XI</i><par n="C__num"/></e>
    <e lm="XII">             <i>XII</i><par n="C__num"/></e>
    <e lm="XIII">            <i>XIII</i><par n="C__num"/></e>
    <e lm="XIV">             <i>XIV</i><par n="C__num"/></e>
    <e lm="XIX">             <i>XIX</i><par n="C__num"/></e>
    <e lm="XV">              <i>XV</i><par n="C__num"/></e>
    <e lm="XVI">             <i>XVI</i><par n="C__num"/></e>
    <e lm="XVII">            <i>XVII</i><par n="C__num"/></e>
    <e lm="XVIII">           <i>XVIII</i><par n="C__num"/></e>
    <e lm="XX">              <i>XX</i><par n="C__num"/></e>
    <e lm="XXI">             <i>XXI</i><par n="C__num"/></e>
